Massachusetts, session 194th, H382.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 142 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 13 the
following section:-
Section 13A. Notwithstanding the state board of building regulations and standards 780
CMR 111, the local building official may issue a certificate of occupancy. All public high school
stadiums shall be exempt from the Uniform State Plumbing Code 248 CMR 10.10:18, pursuant
to section 13, regarding toilet facility requirements in stadiums if the stadium (1) is: built prior to
2006; (2) was funded through the Massachusetts School Building Authority and a municipality;
and (3) is located not more than 200 yards from a municipal high school building.
of 1